Alabama, session 2026rs, HB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) In addition to any compensation paid
to the coroner by law, the Henry County Commission may furnish
the county coroner and the deputy coroner with a vehicle to be
used for official duties of the office of the coroner, subject
to regulation thereof by the county commission. The vehicle
shall be equipped with equipment deemed necessary for the
coroner to carry out official duties, including, but not
limited to, a stretcher and a radio.
(2) Fuel, oil, and repairs to the county issued vehicle
shall be provided at the county's expense. The county
commission may provide the coroner and the deputy coroner with
a county issued gas card to cover the cost of fuel used in the
performance of the official duties of the coroner and the
deputy coroner.
(b) In addition, the Henry County Commission may
reimburse the coroner and the deputy coroner for expenses
related to attending state mandated training or continuing
education.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB184 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed



Page 2